Louisiana, session 2026, SB16.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:185(D)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§185. Educational requirements for members of retirement system boards of trustees
* * *
D.(1) * * *
(3) Each year, any member to whom this Section applies shall attend at least
eight seven hours of investment training, four two hours of actuarial science
information education, two hours one hour of education regarding the laws, rules,
and regulations applicable to his system, and two hours of instruction on fiduciary
duty and ethics. These training hours may be conducted by the staff of the respective
retirement systems or by outside experts. Two or more systems may combine any
such training. Any member who is elected or appointed to the board for the first time
on or after June first shall be required to comply only with the provisions of
Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 16 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 31, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or August 31, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.